Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1354.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.038, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Violence prevention. (a) A school district or charter school conducting an active shooter drill must provide students in middle school and high school at least one hour, or one standard class period, of violence prevention training annually. (b) The violence prevention training must be evidence-based and may be delivered in-person, virtually, or digitally. Training must, at a minimum, teach students the following: (1) how to identify observable warning signs and signals of an individual who may be at risk of harming oneself or others; (2) the importance of taking threats seriously and seeking help; and (3) the steps to report dangerous, violent, threatening, harmful, or potentially harmful activitynew text begin , including providing information about the Department of Public Safety's statewide anonymous threat reporting system and any local threat reporting systemsnew text end . (c) By July 1, 2024, the commissioner of public safety and the commissioner of education must jointly develop a list of evidence-based trainings that a school district or charter school may use to fulfill the requirements of this section, including no-cost programming, if any. The agencies must: (1) post the list publicly on the Minnesota School Safety Center's website; and (2) update the list every two years. (d) A school district or charter school must ensure that students have the opportunity to contribute to their school's safety and violence prevention planning, aligned with the recommendations for multihazard planning for schools, including but not limited to: (1) student opportunities for leadership related to prevention and safety; (2) encouragement and support to students in establishing clubs and programs focused on safety; and (3) providing students with the opportunity to seek help from adults and to learn about prevention connected to topics including bullying, sexual harassment, sexual assault, and suicide. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.06, is amended to read: 121A.06 REPORTS OF DANGEROUS WEAPON INCIDENTS new text begin AND ACTIVE SHOOTER INCIDENTS new text end IN SCHOOL ZONES. Subdivision 1. Definitions. As used in this section: new text begin (1) "active shooter incident" means an event involving an armed individual or individuals on campus or an armed assailant in the immediate vicinity of the school; new text end new text begin (2) "active shooter threat" means a real or perceived threat that an active shooter incident will occur; new text end deleted text begin (1)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end "dangerous weapon" has the meaning given deleted text begin itdeleted text end in section 609.02, subdivision 6; deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end "school" has the meaning given deleted text begin itdeleted text end in section 120A.22, subdivision 4; and deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end "school zone" has the meaning given deleted text begin itdeleted text end in section 152.01, subdivision 14a, clauses (1) and (3). Subd. 2. new text begin Dangerous weapons new text end reports; content. School districts must electronically report to the commissioner of education incidents involving the use or possession of a dangerous weapon in school zones. The deleted text begin formdeleted text end new text begin reportnew text end must include the following information: (1) a description of each incident, including a description of the dangerous weapon involved in the incident; (2) where, at what time, and under what circumstances the incident occurred; (3) information about the offender, other than the offender's name, including the offender's age; whether the offender was a student and, if so, where the offender attended school; and whether the offender was under school expulsion or suspension at the time of the incident; (4) information about the victim other than the victim's name, if any, including the victim's age; whether the victim was a student and, if so, where the victim attended school; and if the victim was not a student, whether the victim was employed at the school; (5) the cost of the incident to the school and to the victim; and (6) the action taken by the school administration to respond to the incident. The commissioner shall provide an electronic reporting format that allows school districts to provide aggregate data. new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Active shooter reports; content. new text end new text begin (a) A school district, charter school, or cooperative unit under section 123A.24, subdivision 2, that serves students must electronically file an after-action review report for active shooter incidents and active shooter threats to the Minnesota Fusion Center. The report must include the following information: new text end new text begin (1) a description of each incident or threat; new text end new text begin (2) how the active shooter threat was communicated, including whether the threat was communicated through social media or email; new text end new text begin (3) information about the individual, other than the individual's name, including the individual's age; whether the individual was a student and, if so, where the individual attended school; and whether the individual was under school expulsion or suspension at the time of the incident; new text end new text begin (4) the immediate cost of the incident to the school, if any; new text end new text begin (5) the action taken by the school administration to respond to the incident or threat, including any referrals to law enforcement or mental health professionals; and new text end new text begin (6) the law enforcement agency or agencies with jurisdiction over the school, even if the incident did not result in a referral to law enforcement. new text end new text begin (b) Reports required under paragraph (a) must be submitted on a form provided by the Minnesota Fusion Center and in a manner consistent with the reporting school's safety plan. The Minnesota Fusion Center must consult with the Minnesota School Safety Center in creation of the reporting form. new text end Subd. 3. Reports; filing requirements. By July 31 of each year, each public school shall report incidents involving the use or possession of a dangerous weapon in school zones to the commissioner. The reports must be submitted using the electronic reporting system developed by the commissioner under subdivision 2. The commissioner shall compile the information it receives from the schools and report it annually to the commissioner of public safety and the legislature. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 145.4718, is amended to read: 145.4718 PROGRAM EVALUATION. (a) The director of child sex trafficking prevention established under section 145.4716 must conduct, or contract for, comprehensive evaluation of the statewide program for safe harbor for sexually exploited youth. The deleted text begin first evaluation must be completed by June 30, 2015, and must be submitteddeleted text end new text begin director must submit an updated evaluationnew text end to the commissioner of health new text begin and to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over health and public safety new text end by September 1deleted text begin , 2015, and every two years thereafterdeleted text end new text begin of each odd-numbered yearnew text end . The evaluation must consider whether the program is reaching intended victims and whether support services are available, accessible, and adequate for sexually exploited youth, as defined in section 260C.007, subdivision 31. (b) In conducting the evaluation, the director of child sex trafficking prevention must consider evaluation of outcomes, including whether the program increases identification of sexually exploited youth, coordination of investigations, access to services and housing available for sexually exploited youth, and improved effectiveness of services. The evaluation must also include examination of the ways in which penalties under section 609.3241 are assessed, collected, and distributed to ensure funding for investigation, prosecution, and victim services to combat sexual exploitation of youth. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.24, is amended to read: 171.24 VIOLATIONS; DRIVING WITHOUT VALID LICENSE. Subdivision 1. Driving after suspension; misdemeanor. Except as otherwise provided in subdivision 5, a person is guilty of a misdemeanor if: (1) the person's driver's license or driving privilege has been suspended; (2) the person has been given notice of or reasonably should know of the suspension; and (3) the person disobeys the order by operating in this state any motor vehicle, the operation of which requires a driver's license, while the person's license or privilege is suspended. Subd. 2. Driving after revocation; misdemeanor. new text begin Except as otherwise provided in subdivision 5, new text end a person is guilty of a misdemeanor if: (1) the person's driver's license or driving privilege has been revoked; (2) the person has been given notice of or reasonably should know of the revocation; and (3) the person disobeys the order by operating in this state any motor vehicle, the operation of which requires a driver's license, while the person's license or privilege is revoked. Subd. 3. Driving after cancellation; misdemeanor. new text begin Except as otherwise provided in subdivision 5, new text end a person is guilty of a misdemeanor if: (1) the person's driver's license or driving privilege has been canceled; (2) the person has been given notice of or reasonably should know of the cancellation; and (3) the person disobeys the order by operating in this state any motor vehicle, the operation of which requires a driver's license, while the person's license or privilege is canceled. Subd. 4. Driving after disqualification; misdemeanor. new text begin Except as otherwise provided in subdivision 5, new text end a person is guilty of a misdemeanor if the person: (1) has been disqualified from holding a commercial driver's license or been denied the privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle; (2) has been given notice of or reasonably should know of the disqualification; and (3) disobeys the order by operating in this state a commercial motor vehicle while the person is disqualified to hold the license or privilege. Subd. 5. Gross misdemeanornew text begin violationsnew text end . new text begin (a) new text end A person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if: (1) the person's driver's license or driving privilege has been canceled or denied under section 171.04, subdivision 1, clause (10); (2) the person has been given notice of or reasonably should know of the cancellation or denial; and (3) the person disobeys the order by operating in this state any motor vehicle, the operation of which requires a driver's license, while the person's license or privilege is canceled or denied. new text begin (b) A person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if the person commits a qualified violation and: new text end new text begin (1) the person causes a collision resulting in substantial bodily harm, as defined in section 609.02, subdivision 7a; great bodily harm, as defined in section 609.02, subdivision 8; or death to another; or new text end new text begin (2) the violation is within ten years of the first of two prior convictions under this section. new text end new text begin (c) For purposes of this subdivision, "qualified violation" means a violation of this section when the suspension, revocation, cancellation, denial, or loss of driving privilege is pursuant to: new text end new text begin (1) section 169.89, subdivision 5; 169A.52; 169A.54; 171.05, subdivision 2b, paragraph (d); 171.13, subdivision 3 or 4; 171.17, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (1) or (10); 171.177; 171.18, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), (3), (4), (5), or (11); 171.32; or 260B.225, subdivision 9; new text end new text begin (2) a violation of section 169.13; 169.21; 169.444; 609.19, subdivision 1, clause (2); or 609.487, subdivisions 3 to 5; new text end new text begin (3) any violation of chapter 169A; or new text end new text begin (4) a law from another state similar to those described in clauses (1) to (3). new text end Subd. 6. Responsibility for prosecution. new text begin (a) new text end The attorney in the jurisdiction in which the violation occurred who is responsible for prosecution of misdemeanor violations of this section is also responsible for prosecution of gross misdemeanor violations of this section. new text begin (b) Nothing in this section or section 609.035 or 609.04 limits the power of the state to prosecute or punish a person for conduct that constitutes any other crime under any other law of this state. new text end Subd. 7. Sufficiency of notice. (a) Notice of revocation, suspension, cancellation, or disqualification is sufficient if personally served, or if mailed by first class mail to the person's last known address or to the address listed on the person's driver's license. Notice is also sufficient if the person was informed that revocation, suspension, cancellation, or disqualification would be imposed upon a condition occurring or failing to occur, and where the condition has in fact occurred or failed to occur. (b) It is not a defense that a person failed to file a change of address with the post office, or failed to notify the department deleted text begin of Public Safetydeleted text end of a change of name or address as required under section 171.11. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to offenses committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 241.021, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Correctional facilities; inspection; licensing. (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), the commissioner of corrections shall inspect and license all correctional facilities throughout the state, whether public or private, established and operated for the detention and confinement of persons confined or incarcerated therein according to law except to the extent that they are inspected or licensed by other state regulating agencies. The commissioner shall promulgate pursuant to chapter 14, rules establishing minimum standards for these facilities with respect to their management, operation, physical condition, and the security, safety, health, treatment, and discipline of persons confined or incarcerated therein. These minimum standards shall include but are not limited to specific guidance pertaining to: (1) screening, appraisal, assessment, and treatment for persons confined or incarcerated in correctional facilities with mental illness or substance use disorders; (2) a policy on the involuntary administration of medicationsnew text begin , including a process for determining on intake whether a Jarvis Order is in place and ensuring it will be followed during the confinement or incarcerationnew text end ; (3) suicide prevention plans and training; (4) verification of medications in a timely manner; (5) well-being checks; (6) discharge planning, including providing prescribed medications to persons confined or incarcerated in correctional facilities upon release; (7) a policy on referrals or transfers to medical or mental health care in a noncorrectional institution; (8) use of segregation and mental health checks; (9) critical incident debriefings; (10) clinical management of substance use disorders and opioid overdose emergency procedures; (11) a policy regarding identification of persons with special needs confined or incarcerated in correctional facilities; (12) a policy regarding the use of telehealth; (13) self-auditing of compliance with minimum standards; (14) information sharing with medical personnel and when medical assessment must be facilitated; (15) a code of conduct policy for facility staff and annual training; (16) a policy on death review of all circumstances surrounding the death of an individual committed to the custody of the facility; and (17) dissemination of a rights statement made available to persons confined or incarcerated in licensed correctional facilities. No individual, corporation, partnership, voluntary association, or other private organization legally responsible for the operation of a correctional facility may operate the facility unless it possesses a current license from the commissioner of corrections. Private adult correctional facilities shall have the authority of section 624.714, subdivision 13, if the Department of Corrections licenses the facility with the authority and the facility meets requirements of section 243.52. The commissioner shall review the correctional facilities described in this subdivision at least once every two years, except as otherwise provided, to determine compliance with the minimum standards established according to this subdivision or other Minnesota statute related to minimum standards and conditions of confinement. The commissioner shall grant a license to any facility found to conform to minimum standards or to any facility which, in the commissioner's judgment, is making satisfactory progress toward substantial conformity and the standards not being met do not impact the interests and well-being of the persons confined or incarcerated in the facility. A limited license under subdivision 1a may be issued for purposes of effectuating a facility closure. The commissioner may grant licensure up to two years. Unless otherwise specified by statute, all licenses issued under this chapter expire at 12:01 a.m. on the day after the expiration date stated on the license. The commissioner shall have access to the buildings, grounds, books, records, staff, and to persons confined or incarcerated in these facilities. The commissioner may require the officers in charge of these facilities to furnish all information and statistics the commissioner deems necessary, at a time and place designated by the commissioner. Notwithstanding chapter 13 or any other state law classifying or restricting access to data, the officers in charge of these facilities must furnish all data available to the facility that the commissioner deems necessary to conduct a review of any emergency or unusual occurrence at the facility. Failure to provide or grant access to relevant information or statistics necessary to fulfill inspection or emergency or unusual occurrence reviews, as requested by the commissioner, may be grounds for the commissioner to take action against a correctional facility's license under subdivision 1a, 1b, or 1c. All facility administrators of correctional facilities are required to report all deaths of individuals who died while committed to the custody of the facility, regardless of whether the death occurred at the facility or after removal from the facility for medical care stemming from an incident or need for medical care at the correctional facility, as soon as practicable, but no later than 24 hours of receiving knowledge of the death, including any demographic information as required by the commissioner. All facility administrators of correctional facilities are required to report all other emergency or unusual occurrences as defined by rule, including uses of force by facility staff that result in substantial bodily harm or suicide attempts, to the commissioner of corrections within ten days from the occurrence, including any demographic information as required by the commissioner. The commissioner of corrections shall consult with the Minnesota Sheriffs' Association and a representative from the Minnesota Association of Community Corrections Act Counties who is responsible for the operations of an adult correctional facility to define "use of force" that results in substantial bodily harm for reporting purposes. The commissioner may require that any or all such information be provided through the Department of Corrections detention information system. The commissioner shall post each inspection report publicly and on the department's website within 30 days of completing the inspection. The education program offered in a correctional facility for the confinement or incarceration of juvenile offenders must be approved by the commissioner of education before the commissioner of corrections may grant a license to the facility. (b) For juvenile facilities licensed by the commissioner of human services, the commissioner may inspect and certify programs based on certification standards set forth in Minnesota Rules. For the purpose of this paragraph, "certification" has the meaning given it in section 245A.02. (c) Any state agency which regulates, inspects, or licenses certain aspects of correctional facilities shall, insofar as is possible, ensure that the minimum standards it requires are substantially the same as those required by other state agencies which regulate, inspect, or license the same aspects of similar types of correctional facilities, although at different correctional facilities. (d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the commissioner of corrections' authority to promulgate rules establishing standards of eligibility for counties to receive funds under chapter 401, or to require counties to comply with operating standards the commissioner establishes as a condition precedent for counties to receive that funding. (e) The department's inspection unit must report directly to a division head outside of the correctional institutions division. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 241.021, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4f. new text end new text begin Medication provision in correctional facilities. new text end new text begin Correctional facilities, as defined in subdivision 1, shall provide to incarcerated individuals the same medications prescribed to those individuals prior to their incarceration or confinement unless a licensed health care professional, as defined in chapter 147 or 148, determines the medication is no longer needed because the condition treated by the medication has resolved, the incarcerated individual no longer wishes to take the medication, or a more effective medication is prescribed to treat the condition and is acceptable to the incarcerated individual. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin [299A.473] CERTAIN GIFTS ALLOWED AFTER OFFICER KILLED IN THE LINE OF DUTY. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) The definitions in this subdivision apply to this section. new text end new text begin (b) "Gift" means money, real or personal property, a plaque, or a service that is given and received without the giver receiving consideration of equal or greater value in return. new text end new text begin (c) "Killed in the line of duty" has the meaning given in section 299A.41, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin (d) "Plaque" means a decorative item with an inscription recognizing an individual for an accomplishment. new text end new text begin (e) "Political subdivision" means a county, home rule charter or statutory city, town, or any other political subdivision of the state. new text end new text begin (f) "Public safety officer" has the meaning given in section 299A.41, subdivision 4. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Gifts; conditions. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding sections 10A.071 and 471.895, a gift may be given by any person to one or more public safety officers if all of the following criteria are met: new text end new text begin (1) a public safety officer employed by the same state agency or political subdivision as the gift recipient was killed in the line of duty; new text end new text begin (2) the gift is given during the consecutive 24-month period beginning on the date of death of the public safety officer killed in the line of duty; new text end new text begin (3) the gift honors, commemorates, or provides team morale and cohesion services to the gift recipient; and new text end new text begin (4) the gift is in compliance with applicable gift policies, if the state agency or political subdivision has adopted such policies under subdivision 4. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin State agency or political subdivision as recipient. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, a state agency or political subdivision may receive a gift that meets the criteria of subdivision 2 on behalf of one or more public safety officers employed by the state agency or political subdivision. The gift must be distributed by the state agency or political subdivision to the intended public safety officer recipients: new text end new text begin (1) within one year of the receipt of the gift; and new text end new text begin (2) in compliance with applicable gift policies, if the state agency or political subdivision has adopted such policies under subdivision 4. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Gift policies. new text end new text begin A state agency or political subdivision may adopt policies with additional requirements and restrictions for gifts to public safety officers employed by the state agency or political subdivision. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to gifts given on or after that date. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.477, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Program established. The commissioner of public safety shall award a grant to the Minnesota Firefighter Initiative to administer a hometown heroes assistance program for Minnesota firefighters. The Minnesota Firefighter Initiative shall use the grant funds: (1) to establish and fund critical illness coverage that provides monetary support payments to each firefighter who is diagnosed with a critical illness on or after August 1, 2021, and who applies for the payment. Monetary support shall be provided according to the requirements in subdivision 3; (2) to develop a psychotherapy program customized to address emotional trauma experienced by firefightersnew text begin , which includes providing peer-to-peer support,new text end and to offer all firefighters in the state up to five psychotherapy sessions per year under the customized program, provided by mental health professionals; (3) to coordinate additional psychotherapy sessions to firefighters who need them; (4) to develop, deleted text begin annuallydeleted text end update, and annually deleted text begin providedeleted text end new text begin make availablenew text end to all firefighters in the state at least two hours of training on critical illnesses, such as cancer and heart disease, and emotional trauma as causes of illness and death for firefighters; steps and best practices for firefighters to limit the occupational risks of cancer, heart disease, and emotional trauma; provide evidence-based suicide prevention strategies; and ways for firefighters to address occupation-related emotional trauma and promote emotional wellness. The training shall be presented by firefighters who attend an additional course to prepare them to serve as trainers; and (5) for administrative and overhead costs of the Minnesota Firefighter Initiative associated with conducting the activities in clauses (1) to (4). new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299C.055, is amended to read: 299C.055 LEGISLATIVE REPORT ON FUSION CENTER ACTIVITIES. (a) The superintendent must prepare an annual report for the public and the legislature on the Minnesota Fusion Center (MNFC) that includes general information about the MNFC; the types of activities it monitors; the scale of information it collects; the local, state, and federal agencies with which it shares information; and the quantifiable benefits it produces. None of the reporting requirements in this section supersede chapter 13 or any other state or federal law. The superintendent must report on activities for the preceding calendar year unless another time period is specified. The report must include the following information, to the extent allowed by other law: (1) the MNFC's operating budget for the current biennium, number of staff, and staff duties; (2) the number of publications generated and an overview of the type of information provided in the publications, including products such as law enforcement briefs, partner briefs, risk assessments, threat assessments, and operational reports; (3) a summary of audit findings for the MNFC and what corrective actions were taken pursuant to audits; (4) the number of data requests received by the MNFC and a general description of those requests; (5) the types of surveillance and data analysis technologies utilized by the MNFC, such as artificial intelligence or social media analysis tools; (6) a description of the commercial and governmental databases utilized by the MNFC to the extent permitted by law; (7) the number of suspicious activity reports (SARs) received and processed by the MNFC; (8) the number of SARs received and processed by the MNFC that were converted into Bureau of Criminal Apprehension case files, that were referred to the Federal Bureau of Investigation, or that were referred to local law enforcement agencies; (9) the number of SARs received and processed by the MNFC that involve an individual on the Terrorist Screening Center watchlist; (10) the number of requests for information (RFIs) that the MNFC received from law enforcement agencies and the number of responses to federal requests for RFIs; (11) the names of the federal agencies the MNFC received data from or shared data with; (12) the names of the agencies that submitted SARs; (13) a summary description of the MNFC's activities with the Joint Terrorism Task Force; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (14) the number of investigations aided by the MNFC's use of SARs and RFIsdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (15) the number of tips received through the Department of Public Safety's anonymous threat reporting system, including the See It, Say It, Send It application, and the number of those tips that the MNFC processed; and new text end new text begin (16) the number of active shooter incident reports received from school districts pursuant to section 121A.06, subdivision 2a, paragraph (b); a summary of the reports; and the number of reports that were converted into Bureau of Criminal Apprehension case files, that were referred to the Federal Bureau of Investigation, or that were referred to local law enforcement agencies. new text end (b) The report shall be provided to the chairs and ranking minority members of the committees of the house of representatives and senate with jurisdiction over data practices and public safety issues, and shall be posted on the MNFC website by February 15 each year beginning on February 15, 2024. Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299C.52, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. As used in sections 299C.52 to 299C.565, the following terms have the meanings given them: (a) "Child" means any person under the age of 18 years or any person certified or known to be mentally incompetent. (b) "DNA" means deoxyribonucleic acid from a human biological specimen. (c) "Endangered" means that a law enforcement official has received sufficient evidence that the missing person is at risk of physical injury or death. The following circumstances indicate that a missing person is at risk of physical injury or death: (1) the person is missing as a result of a confirmed abduction or under circumstances that indicate that the person's disappearance was not voluntary; (2) the person is missing under known dangerous circumstances; (3) the person is missing more than 30 days; (4) the person is under the age of 21 and at least one other factor in this paragraph is applicable; (5) there is evidence the person is in need of medical attention or prescription medication such that it will have a serious adverse effect on the person's health if the person does not receive the needed care or medication; (6) the person does not have a pattern of running away or disappearing; (7) the person is mentally impaired; (8)new text begin the person has dementia, a traumatic brain injury, Alzheimer's disease, or other cognitive impairments;new text end new text begin (9)new text end there is evidence that the person may have been abducted by a noncustodial parent; deleted text begin (9)deleted text end new text begin (10)new text end the person has been the subject of past threats or acts of violence; deleted text begin (10)deleted text end new text begin (11)new text end there is evidence the person is lost in the wilderness, backcountry, or outdoors where survival is precarious and immediate and effective investigation and search and rescue efforts are critical; or deleted text begin (11)deleted text end new text begin (12)new text end any other factor that the law enforcement agency deems to indicate that the person may be at risk of physical injury or death, including a determination by another law enforcement agency that the person is missing and endangered. (d) "Missing" means the status of a person after a law enforcement agency that has received a report of a missing person has conducted a preliminary investigation and determined that the person cannot be located. (e) "NCIC" means National Crime Information Center. Sec. 11. new text begin [299C.77] FEDERAL BACKGROUND CHECKS BY POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin As used in this section, "applicant for licensure" means an individual or if the applicant is a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or other legal entity, every officer, director, manager, and general partner of the entity, who seeks a license issued by a county or city to operate a business: new text end new text begin (1) that qualifies as an adult entertainment establishment under section 617.242, subdivision 1; or new text end new text begin (2) providing massage services. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Background check authorized. new text end new text begin (a) A county or city may investigate the criminal history background of any applicant for licensure. new text end new text begin (b) The investigation conducted pursuant to paragraph (a) must consist of a criminal history check of the state criminal records repository and a national criminal history check. The county or city must accept the applicant's signed criminal history records check consent form for the state and national criminal history check request, a full set of classifiable fingerprints, and required fees. The county or city must submit the applicant's completed criminal history records check consent form, full set of classifiable fingerprints, and required fees to the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension. After receiving this information, the bureau must conduct a Minnesota criminal history records check of the applicant. The bureau may exchange an applicant's fingerprints with the Federal Bureau of Investigation to obtain the applicant's national criminal history record information. The bureau must return the results of the Minnesota and federal criminal history records checks to the county or city. Using the criminal history data provided by the bureau, the county or city must determine whether the applicant is disqualified from licensure. The applicant's failure to cooperate with the county or city in conducting the records check is reasonable cause to deny an application. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299C.80, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Reporting. new text begin (a) new text end As provided for in chapter 13, the superintendent must make all inactive investigative data for officer-involved death investigations that are public under section 13.82, subdivision 7, or other applicable law available on the bureau's website within 30 days deleted text begin of the end of the last criminal appeal of a subject of an investigation.deleted text end new text begin of the case becoming inactive as defined in section 13.82, subdivision 7, except any video that does not record, describe, or otherwise document actions and circumstances surrounding the officer-involved death.new text end new text begin (b)new text end By February 1 of each year, the superintendent shall report to the commissioner, the governor, and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over public safety finance and policy the following information about the unit: the number of investigations initiated; the number of incidents investigated; the outcomes or current status of each investigation; the charging decisions made by the prosecuting authority of incidents investigated by the unit; the number of plea agreements reached in incidents investigated by the unit; and any other information relevant to the unit's mission. new text begin (c) Nothing in this subdivision modifies the requirements of chapter 13 or the classification of data. new text end Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 471.198, is amended to read: 471.198 EXPENDITURES; NATIONAL NIGHT OUT; LAW ENFORCEMENT COMMUNITY EVENTSnew text begin ; FALLEN OFFICERSnew text end . new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) The definitions in this subdivision apply to this section. new text end new text begin (b) "Local government" means a home rule charter or statutory city, town, or county. new text end new text begin (c) "Qualified individual" means an individual with one of the following relationships to a local government expending money under this section: new text end new text begin (1) an employee of the local government; new text end new text begin (2) an immediate family member of an employee of the local government; or new text end new text begin (3) an immediate family member of a fallen officer who was employed by the local government. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Authorized expenditures. new text end (a) deleted text begin Any home rule charter or statutory city or any town, county, or school districtdeleted text end new text begin A local governmentnew text end may spend money for new text begin the following purposes:new text end new text begin (1) new text end National Night Out events held in the jurisdiction of the local government spending the moneydeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end deleted text begin (b) Any home rule charter or statutory city or any town, county, or school district may spend money fordeleted text end new text begin (2)new text end any event or purpose that the governing bodynew text begin of the local governmentnew text end determines will foster positive relationships between law enforcement and the communitydeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (3) funding a funeral or memorial for a public safety officer killed in the line of duty; and new text end new text begin (4) funding travel and participation for qualified individuals in national memorial events for fallen public safety officers occurring within 24 months of a line-of-duty death of an officer or employee of the local government. new text end new text begin (b) A school district is authorized to spend money for the purposes of paragraph (a), clauses (1) and (2). new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Contributions solicitation. new text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end Notwithstanding any law or ordinance to the contrary, any deleted text begin home rule charter or statutory city, or any town, county,deleted text end new text begin local governmentnew text end or school district may, by resolution, authorize officials and staff to solicit contributions for the purposes authorized in deleted text begin paragraphs (a) and (b)deleted text end new text begin subdivision 2new text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 595.02, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Competency of witnesses. Every person of sufficient understanding, including a party, may testify in any action or proceeding, civil or criminal, in court or before any person who has authority to receive evidence, except as provided in this subdivision: (a) A husband cannot be examined for or against his wife without her consent, nor a wife for or against her husband without his consent, nor can either, during the marriage or afterwards, without the consent of the other, be examined as to any communication made by one to the other during the marriage. This exception does not apply to a civil action or proceeding by one against the other, nor to a criminal action or proceeding for a crime committed by one against the other or against a child of either or against a child under the care of either spouse, nor to a criminal action or proceeding in which one is charged with homicide or an attempt to commit homicide and the date of the marriage of the defendant is subsequent to the date of the offense, nor to an action or proceeding for nonsupport, neglect, dependency, or termination of parental rights. (b) An attorney cannot, without the consent of the attorney's client, be examined as to any communication made by the client to the attorney or the attorney's advice given thereon in the course of professional duty; nor can any employee of the attorney be examined as to the communication or advice, without the client's consent. (c) A member of the clergy or other minister of any religion shall not, without the consent of the party making the confession, be allowed to disclose a confession made to the member of the clergy or other minister in a professional character, in the course of discipline enjoined by the rules or practice of the religious body to which the member of the clergy or other minister belongs; nor shall a member of the clergy or other minister of any religion be examined as to any communication made to the member of the clergy or other minister by any person seeking religious or spiritual advice, aid, or comfort or advice given thereon in the course of the member of the clergy's or other minister's professional character, without the consent of the person. (d) A licensed physician or surgeon, dentist, or chiropractor shall not, without the consent of the patient, be allowed to disclose any information or any opinion based thereon which the professional acquired in attending the patient in a professional capacity, and which was necessary to enable the professional to act in that capacity; after the decease of the patient, in an action to recover insurance benefits, where the insurance has been in existence two years or more, the beneficiaries shall be deemed to be the personal representatives of the deceased person for the purpose of waiving this privilege, and no oral or written waiver of the privilege shall have any binding force or effect except when made upon the trial or examination where the evidence is offered or received. (e) A public officer shall not be allowed to disclose communications made to the officer in official confidence when the public interest would suffer by the disclosure. (f) Persons of unsound mind and persons intoxicated at the time of their production for examination are not competent witnesses if they lack capacity to remember or to relate truthfully facts respecting which they are examined. (g) A registered nurse, psychologist, consulting psychologist, or licensed social worker engaged in a psychological or social assessment or treatment of an individual at the individual's request shall not, without the consent of the professional's client, be allowed to disclose any information or opinion based thereon which the professional has acquired in attending the client in a professional capacity, and which was necessary to enable the professional to act in that capacity. Nothing in this clause exempts licensed social workers from compliance with the provisions of section 626.557 and chapter 260E. (h) An interpreter for a person disabled in communication shall not, without the consent of the person, be allowed to disclose any communication if the communication would, if the interpreter were not present, be privileged. For purposes of this section, a "person disabled in communication" means a person who, because of a hearing, speech or other communication disorder, or because of the inability to speak or comprehend the English language, is unable to understand the proceedings in which the person is required to participate. The presence of an interpreter as an aid to communication does not destroy an otherwise existing privilege. (i) Licensed chemical dependency counselors shall not disclose information or an opinion based on the information which they acquire from persons consulting them in their professional capacities, and which was necessary to enable them to act in that capacity, except that they may do so: (1) when informed consent has been obtained in writing, except in those circumstances in which not to do so would violate the law or would result in clear and imminent danger to the client or others; (2) when the communications reveal the contemplation or ongoing commission of a crime; or (3) when the consulting person waives the privilege by bringing suit or filing charges against the licensed professional whom that person consulted. (j) A parent or the parent's minor child may not be examined as to any communication made in confidence by the minor to the minor's parent. A communication is confidential if made out of the presence of persons not members of the child's immediate family living in the same household. This exception may be waived by express consent to disclosure by a parent entitled to claim the privilege or by the child who made the communication or by failure of the child or parent to object when the contents of a communication are demanded. This exception does not apply to a civil action or proceeding by one spouse against the other or by a parent or child against the other, nor to a proceeding to commit either the child or parent to whom the communication was made or to place the person or property or either under the control of another because of an alleged mental or physical condition, nor to a criminal action or proceeding in which the parent is charged with a crime committed against the person or property of the communicating child, the parent's spouse, or a child of either the parent or the parent's spouse, or in which a child is charged with a crime or act of delinquency committed against the person or property of a parent or a child of a parent, nor to an action or proceeding for termination of parental rights, nor any other action or proceeding on a petition alleging child abuse, child neglect, abandonment or nonsupport by a parent. (k) Sexual assault counselors may not be allowed to disclose any opinion or information received from or about the victim without the consent of the victim. However, a counselor may be compelled to identify or disclose information in investigations or proceedings related to neglect or termination of parental rights if the court determines good cause exists. In determining whether to compel disclosure, the court shall weigh the public interest and need for disclosure against the effect on the victim, the treatment relationship, and the treatment services if disclosure occurs. Nothing in this clause exempts sexual assault counselors from compliance with the provisions of section 626.557 and chapter 260E. "Sexual assault counselor" for the purpose of this section means a person who has undergone at least 40 hours of crisis counseling training and works under the direction of a supervisor in a crisis center, whose primary purpose is to render advice, counseling, or assistance to victims of sexual assault. (l) A domestic abuse advocate deleted text begin maydeleted text end new text begin shallnew text end notnew text begin , without the consent of the victim,new text end be deleted text begin compelleddeleted text end new text begin allowednew text end to disclose any opinion or information received from or about the victim deleted text begin without the consent of the victim unless ordered by the courtdeleted text end new text begin that the advocate acquired in attending to the victim in a professional capacitynew text end . deleted text begin In determining whether to compel disclosure, the court shall weigh the public interest and need for disclosure against the effect on the victim, the relationship between the victim and domestic abuse advocate, and the services if disclosure occurs.deleted text end Nothing in this paragraphnew text begin (1)new text end exempts domestic abuse advocates from compliance with the provisions of section 626.557 and chapter 260Enew text begin , or (2) modifies a prosecutor's obligation to disclose material and information to the defense when the information is in the possession or control of members of the prosecution staff and of any others who have participated in the investigation or evaluation of the case and who either regularly report, or with reference to the particular case have reported, to the prosecutor's officenew text end . For the purposes of this section, "domestic abuse advocate" means an employee or supervised volunteer from a community-based deleted text begin battered women's shelter anddeleted text end domestic abuse program eligible to receive grants under section 611A.32; that provides information, advocacy, crisis intervention, emergency shelter, or support to victims of domestic abuse and who is not employed by or under the direct supervision of a law enforcement agency, a prosecutor's office, or by a city, county, or state agency. (m) A person cannot be examined as to any communication or document, including work notes, made or used in the course of or because of mediation pursuant to an agreement to mediate or a collaborative law process pursuant to an agreement to participate in collaborative law. This does not apply to the parties in the dispute in an application to a court by a party to have a mediated settlement agreement or a stipulated agreement resulting from the collaborative law process set aside or reformed. A communication or document otherwise not privileged does not become privileged because of this paragraph. This paragraph is not intended to limit the privilege accorded to communication during mediation or collaborative law by the common law. (n) A child under ten years of age is a competent witness unless the court finds that the child lacks the capacity to remember or to relate truthfully facts respecting which the child is examined. A child describing any act or event may use language appropriate for a child of that age. (o) A communication assistant for a telecommunications relay system for persons who have communication disabilities shall not, without the consent of the person making the communication, be allowed to disclose communications made to the communication assistant for the purpose of relaying. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.101, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Minimum fines. Notwithstanding any other law, when a court sentences a person convicted of violating section 609.221, 609.222, 609.223, 609.2231, 609.224, 609.2242, 609.267, 609.2671, 609.2672, 609.342, 609.343, 609.344, or 609.345, it must impose a fine of not less than 30 percent of the maximum fine authorized by law nor more than the maximum fine authorized by law. The court shall collect the portion of the fine mandated by this subdivision and forward 70 percent of it to a local victim assistance program that provides services locally in the county in which the crime was committed. The court shall forward the remaining 30 percent to the commissioner of management and budget to be credited to the general fund. If more than one victim assistance program serves the county in which the crime was committed, the court may designate on a case-by-case basis which program will receive the fine proceeds, giving consideration to the nature of the crime committed, the types of victims served by the program, and the funding needs of the program. If no victim assistance program serves that county, the court shall forward 100 percent of the fine proceeds to the commissioner of management and budget to be credited to the general fund. Fine proceeds received by a local victim assistance program must be used to provide direct services to crime victims. The minimum fine required by this subdivision is in addition to the surcharge or assessment required by section 357.021, subdivision 6, and is in addition to any sentence of imprisonment or restitution imposed or ordered by the court. As used in this subdivision, "victim assistance program" means victim witness programs within county attorney offices or any of the following programs: crime victim crisis centers, victim-witness programs, deleted text begin battered womendeleted text end new text begin domestic abuse victim new text end shelters and nonshelter programs, deleted text begin anddeleted text end sexual assault programsnew text begin , and children's advocacy centers as defined in section 260E.02, subdivision 5new text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 611A.02, is amended to read: 611A.02 NOTIFICATION OF VICTIM SERVICES AND VICTIMS' RIGHTS. Subd. 2. Victims' rights. (a) The Office of Justice Programs in the Department of Public Safety shall update the deleted text begin twodeleted text end model notices of the rights of crime victimsnew text begin required to be distributed under this section and section 629.341new text end . (b) The initial notice of the rights of crime victims must be distributed by a peace officer to each victim, as defined in section 611A.01, at the time of initial contact with the victimnew text begin at the scene or when the victim makes a reportnew text end . The noticenew text begin , which may be distributed as a document or electronically,new text end must inform a victim of: (1) the victim's right to apply deleted text begin for reparationsdeleted text end new text begin to the Minnesota Crime Victims Reimbursement Programnew text end to cover losses, not including property losses, resulting from a violent crime deleted text begin and the telephone number to call to request an applicationdeleted text end new text begin and information on how to applynew text end ; (2) the victim's right to request that the law enforcement agency withhold public access to data revealing the victim's identity under section 13.82, subdivision 17, paragraph (d); (3) the additional rights of domestic abuse victims as described in section 629.341; (4) information on new text begin statewide crime victim help lines, the state address confidentiality program, and new text end the nearest crime victim assistance program or resource;new text begin andnew text end (5) the deleted text begin victim's rights, if an offender is charged, to be informed of and participate in the prosecution process, including the right to request restitution; anddeleted text end new text begin right to be notified if an offender is charged, to participate in the prosecution process, and to request restitution upon conviction.new text end deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (c) A supplemental notice must be distributed by law enforcement agenciesnew text end in homicide casesdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin and must include resources and information specific to homicide victims andnew text end information on rights and procedures available under sections 524.2-803, 524.3-614, and 524.3-615. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end A supplemental notice of the rights of crime victims must be distributed by the city or county attorney's office to each victimdeleted text begin ,deleted text end within a reasonable time after the offender is charged or petitioned. This notice must inform a victim of all the rights of crime victims under this chapter. Subd. 3. Notice of rights of victims in juvenile court. deleted text begin (a) The Office of Justice Programs in the Department of Public Safety shall update the notice of the rights of victims in juvenile court that explainsdeleted text end new text begin A supplemental notice shall be distributed by the prosecutor's office to each victim of an offense committed by a juvenile within a reasonable time after the petition is filed. This notice must notify the victim ofnew text end : (1) the rights of victims in the juvenile court; (2) when a juvenile matter is public; (3) the procedures to be followed in juvenile court proceedings; deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin (4) the right to attend certain juvenile court proceedings; new text end new text begin (5) the information related to the juvenile case that is available to victims; and new text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end other relevant matters. deleted text begin (b) The juvenile court shall distribute a copy of the notice to each victim of juvenile crime who attends a juvenile court proceeding, along with a notice of services for victims available in that judicial district. deleted text end Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 611A.0315, is amended to read: 611A.0315 VICTIM NOTIFICATION; DOMESTIC ASSAULT; CRIMINAL SEXUAL CONDUCT; HARASSMENT; STALKING. Subdivision 1. Notice of decision not to prosecute. (a) A prosecutor shall make every reasonable effort to notify a victim of domestic assault, a criminal sexual conduct offense, deleted text begin ordeleted text end harassment or stalkingnew text begin , a violation of an order for protection, domestic abuse no contact order, or harassment restraining ordernew text end that the prosecutor has decided to decline prosecution of the case or to dismiss the criminal charges filed against the defendant. Efforts to notify the victim should include, in order of priority: (1) contacting the victim or a person designated by the victim by telephone; and (2) contacting the victim by new text begin email or new text end mail. If a suspect is still in custody, deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin a telephone or emailnew text end notification attempt shall be made before the suspect is released from custody. (b) Whenever a prosecutor dismisses criminal charges against a person accused of domestic assault, a criminal sexual conduct offense, deleted text begin ordeleted text end harassment or stalking, new text begin a violation of an order for protection, or a violation of a harassment restraining order, new text end a record shall be made of the specific reasons for the dismissal. If the dismissal is due to the unavailability of the witness, the prosecutor shall indicate the specific reason that the witness is unavailable. (c) Whenever a prosecutor notifies a victim of domestic assault, criminal sexual conduct, or harassment or stalking under this section, the prosecutor shall also inform the victim of the method and benefits of seeking an order for protection under section 518B.01 or a restraining order under section 609.748 and that the victim may seek an order without paying a fee. Subd. 2. Definitions. For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given deleted text begin themdeleted text end . (a) "Assault" has the meaning given it in section 609.02, subdivision 10. (b) "Domestic assault" means an assault committed by the actor against a family or household member. (c) "Family or household member" has the meaning given it in section 518B.01, subdivision 2. (d) "Harassment" or "stalking" means a violation of section 609.749. (e) "Criminal sexual conduct offense" means a violation of sections 609.342 to 609.3453. new text begin (f) "Violation of an order for protection" has the meaning given in section 518B.01, subdivision 14. new text end new text begin (g) "Violation of a harassment restraining order" has the meaning given in section 609.748, subdivision 6. new text end Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 629.341, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Notice of rights. The peace officer shall deleted text begin telldeleted text end new text begin orally notifynew text end the victim deleted text begin whether adeleted text end new text begin aboutnew text end shelter or other services deleted text begin aredeleted text end available in the community and give the victim immediate new text begin written new text end notice of the legal deleted text begin rights anddeleted text end remedies new text begin and resources new text end available. The new text begin written new text end notice must include deleted text begin furnishing the victim a copy ofdeleted text end the following statement: deleted text begin "IF YOU ARE THE VICTIM OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, you can ask the city or county attorney to file a criminal complaint. You also have the right to go to court and file a petition requesting an order for protection from domestic abuse. The order could include the following: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) an order restraining the abuser from further acts of abuse; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) an order directing the abuser to leave your household; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) an order preventing the abuser from entering your residence, school, business, or place of employment; deleted text end deleted text begin (4) an order awarding you or the other parent custody of or parenting time with your minor child or children; or deleted text end deleted text begin (5) an order directing the abuser to pay support to you and the minor children if the abuser has a legal obligation to do so." deleted text end new text begin "IF YOU ARE A VICTIM OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, you can file a petition with the court for an order for protection and ask that the person responsible for the domestic violence: new text end new text begin (1) Be restrained from further acts of abuse; new text end new text begin (2) Leave your household; new text end new text begin (3) Stay away from your residence, school, business, or place of employment; and new text end new text begin (4) Pay temporary support to you and for the minor child if the person is legally obligated to do so. new text end new text begin In your petition, you can request a custody and parenting time order for a child in common with the person." new text end The notice must include the deleted text begin resource listing, including telephone number, for the area program that providesdeleted text end new text begin statewide domestic abuse help line and contact information for area organizations providingnew text end services to victims of domestic abuse as deleted text begin shelter,deleted text end designated by the Office of Justice Programs in the Department of Public Safety. Sec. 19. new text begin USE OF EXISTING SUPPLY.new text end new text begin A law enforcement agency, city attorney's office, or county attorney's office may exhaust existing notices before producing materials with the modifications required under Minnesota Statutes, sections 611A.02, subdivision 2, and 629.341, subdivision 3. new text end Sec. 20. new text begin TITLE.new text end new text begin Sections 5 and 6 of this act shall be known as the "Larry R. Hill Medical Reform Act." new text end